DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

DI-483

DI1B9-35

DTC BO 108/52 Short in P Squib Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the front passenger airbag assembly.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.
DTC B0108/52 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the P squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

« Shortin P squib circuit (to B+)
B0108/52 ¢ P squib malfunction
« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

« Front passenger airbag assembly (P squib)
* Airbag sensorassembly
» Dashwire

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-473.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check dash wire (P squib circuit).

OK:

H01022
AB0119
H16857

sembly (P squib) side.

Voltage: Below 1V

Dash Wire PREPARATION:
Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery, and wait
:| Airbag at least for 2 seconds.
C[l Sensor CHECK:
P Squib :| Assembly (a) Turnthe ignition switchto ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and P+ of
Q’ the dash wire connector on the front passenger airbag as-

H17092
e )

Repair or replace dash wire.

@
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Dash Wire
P Squib

]Airbag
Sensor
]Assembly

]
7 =

H01023
H16855 AB0118
H10600 HO01076 H17093
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PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Using a service wire, connect P+ and P- of the dash wire
connector on the front passenger airbag assembly (P
squib) side.

(e) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTCBO 108/52is notoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0108/52 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check P squib.

P Squib

HO01024
ABO119
H10600 HO01076

dI=

— e

:l Airbag
Sensor
Assembly

DTC B0108/52

H10618

@

PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the front passenger airbag assembly (P squib)
connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCBO 108/52is notoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0108/52 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

(P squib).

NG> Replace front passenger airbag assembly

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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